North Dakota, session 69, SB2121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 23 of section 54-52-01 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
23. "Temporary employee" means an employee who is not eligible to participate as a permanent
employee, who is at least eighteen years old and not actively contributing to another
employer-sponsored pensionretirement fund, and, if employed by a school district, occupies a
noncertified teacher's position.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 54-52-17 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-52-17. Formulation of plan. (Retroactive application - See note)
Participating members shall receive benefits according to this section and according to rules
adopted by the board, not inconsistent with this chapter. No personAn individual is not entitled to
receive a prior service benefit if the personindividual was not continuously employed by a governmental
unit in North Dakota for a period of not less than two years immediately prior tobefore eligibility for
retirement.
1. Participating members shall receive credit for full-time employment or its equivalent from the
date they attain eligibility until their normal retirement date, postponed retirement date, or early
retirement date, as defined in this section. Part-time employment will be recognized as
full-time employment on a prorated basis as the board may prescribe.
2. Retirement benefits are calculated from the participating member's final average salary, which
is the average of the highest salary received by the member for any thirty-six months
employed during the last one hundred twenty months of employment. For members who
terminate employment on or after August 1, 2010, final average salary is the average of the
highest salary received by the member for any thirty-six months employed during the last one
hundred eighty months of employment. For members who terminate employment between
July 31, 2005, and August 1, 2010, final average salary is the average of the highest salary
received by the member for any thirty-six months employed during the period for which the
board has appropriate and accurate salary records on the board's electronic database, but
that period may not be more than the last one hundred eighty months of employment. For
members who terminate employment after December 31, 2019, final average salary is the
higher of the final average salary calculated on December 31, 2019, or the average salary
earned in the three highest periods of twelve consecutive months employed during the last
one hundred eighty months of employment. Months without earnings are excluded for the
purpose of computing an average. If the participating member has worked for less than
thirty-six months at the normal retirement date, the final average salary is the average salary
for the total months of employment.
3. Retirement dates are defined as follows:

S. B. NO. 2121 - PAGE 2
a. Normal retirement date, except for a national guard security officer or firefighter, a
firefighter employed by a political subdivision, a peace officer employed by the state, or a
peace officer or correctional officer employed by a political subdivision, is:
(1) The first day of the month next following the month in which the member attains the
age of sixty-five years; or
(2) When the member has a combined total of years of service credit and years of age
equal to eighty-five and has not received a retirement benefit under this chapter.
b. Normal retirement date for members first enrolled after December 31, 2015, except for a
national guard security officer or firefighter, a firefighter employed by a political
subdivision, a peace officer employed by the state, a peace officer or correctional officer
employed by a political subdivision, or a supreme court or district court judge, is:
(1) The first day of the month next following the month in which the member attains the
age of sixty-five years; or
(2) When the member has a combined total of years of service credit and years of age
equal to ninety and the member attains a minimum age of sixty and has not
received a retirement benefit under this chapter.
c. Normal retirement date for a national guard security officer or firefighter is:
(1) The first day of the month next following the month in which the national guard
security officer or firefighter attains the age of fifty-five years and has completed at
least three eligible years of employment; or
(2) When the national guard security officer or firefighter has a combined total of years
of service credit and years of age equal to eighty-five and has not received a
retirement benefit under this chapter.
d. Normal retirement date for a peace officer, firefighter, or correctional officer employed by
a political subdivision is:
(1) The first day of the month next following the month in which the peace officer,
firefighter, or correctional officer attains the age of fifty-five years and has completed
at least three eligible years of employment; or
(2) When the peace officer, firefighter, or correctional officer has a combined total of
years of service credit and years of age equal to eighty-five and has not received a
retirement benefit under this chapter.
e. (1) Normal retirement date for a peace officer employed by the bureau of criminal
investigation is:
(a) [1] For a member employed before August 1, 2023, the first day of the
month next following the month in which the peace officer attains the age
of fifty-five years and has completed at least three eligible years of
employment; and
[2] For a member employed after July 31, 2023, the first day of the month
next following the month in which the peace officer attains the age of
fifty-five years and has completed at least ten eligible years of
employment; or
(b) When the peace officer has a combined total of years of service credit and
years of age equal to eighty-five and has not received a retirement benefit
under this chapter.

S. B. NO. 2121 - PAGE 3
(2) Normal retirement date for a peace officer employed by the state, other than a
peace officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation, is:
(a) The first day of the month next following the month in which the peace officer
attains the age of fifty-five years and has completed at least three eligible
years of employment; or
(b) When the peace officer has a combined total of years of service credit and
years of age equal to eighty-five and has not received a retirement benefit
under this chapter.
f. Postponed retirement date is the first day of the month next following the month in which
the member, on or after July 1, 1977, actually severs or has severed the member's
employment after reaching the normal retirement date.
g. (1) Early retirement date, except for a national guard security officer or firefighter, a
firefighter, peace officer, or correctional officer employed by a political subdivision,
or a peace officer employed by the state, is the first day of the month next following
the month in which the member attains the age of fifty-five years and has completed
three years of eligible employment.
(2) For a national guard security officer or firefighter, early retirement date is the first
day of the month next following the month in which the national guard security
officer or firefighter attains the age of fifty years and has completed at least three
years of eligible employment.
(3) For a peace officer employed by the state, other than a peace officer employed by
the bureau of criminal investigation, or a firefighter, peace officer, or correctional
officer employed by a political subdivision, early retirement date is the first day of
the month next following the month in which the peace officer, firefighter, or
correctional officer attains the age of fifty years and has completed at least three
years of eligible employment.
(4) For a peace officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation, early
retirement date is the first day of the month next following the month in which the
peace officer attains the age of fifty years and has completed:
(a) If hired before Augus t 1, 2023 , at least three years of eligible employment; or
(b) If hired after July 31, 2023, at least ten years of eligible employmen t.
h. Disability retirement date is the first day of the month after a member becomes
permanently and totally disabled, according to medical evidence called for under the
rules of the board, and has completed at least one hundred eighty days of eligible
employment. For supreme and district court judges, permanent and total disability is
based solely on a judge's inability to perform judicial duties arising out of physical or
mental impairment, as determined pursuant to rules adopted by the board or as provided
by subdivision a of subsection 3 of section 27-23-03.
(1) A member is eligible to receive disability retirement benefits only if the member
became disabled during the period of eligible employment and applies for disability
retirement benefits within twelve months of the date the member terminates
employment.
(2) A member is eligible to continue to receive disability benefits as long as the
permanent and total disability continues and the member submits the necessary
documentation and undergoes medical testing required by the board, or for as long
as the member participates in a rehabilitation program required by the board, or

S. B. NO. 2121 - PAGE 4
both. If the board determines a member no longer meets the eligibility definition, the
board may discontinue the disability retirement benefit. The board may pay the cost
of any medical testing or rehabilitation services the board deems necessary and
these payments are appropriated from the retirement fund for those purposes. A
member's receipt of disability benefits under this section is limited to receipt from
the fund to which the member was actively contributing at the time the member
became disabled.
4. The board shall calculate retirement benefits as follows:
a. Normal retirement benefits for all retireesa retiree, except a supreme andor district court
judgesjudge, peace officersofficer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation,
andor other peace officersofficer employed by the state, reaching normal retirement date
equalequals an annual amount, payable monthly, comprised of a service benefit and a
prior service benefit, as defined in this chapter, which is determined as follows:
(1) For membersa member first enrolled:
(a) Before January 1, 2020, service benefit equals two percent of final average
salary multiplied by the number of years of service employment.
(b) After December 31, 2019, service benefit equals one and seventy-five
hundredths percent of final average salary multiplied by the number of years
of service employment.
(2) Prior service benefit equals two percent of final average salary multiplied by the
number of years of prior service employment.
b. Normal retirement benefits for alla supreme andor district court judgesjudge under the
public employees retirement system reaching normal retirement date equalequals an
annual amount, payable monthly, comprised of a benefit as defined in this chapter,
determined as follows:
(1) Benefits must be calculated from the time of appointment or election to the bench
and must equal three and one-half percent of final average salary multiplied by the
first ten years of judicial service, two and eighty hundredths percent of final average
salary multiplied by the second ten years of judicial service, and one and one-fourth
percent of final average salary multiplied by the number of years of judicial service
exceeding twenty years.
(2) Service benefits must include, in addition, an amount equal to the percent specified
in subdivision a of final average salary multiplied by the number of years of
nonjudicial employee service and employment.
c. Normal retirement benefits for a peace officer employed by the bureau of criminal
investigation reaching the normal retirement date equals an annual amount, payable
monthly, comprised of a service benefit and a prior service benefit determined as follows:
(1) The first twenty years of credited service multiplied by three percent of final average
salary.
(2) For years in excess of twenty years of credited service multiplied by one and
seventy-five hundredths percent of final average salary.
d. Normal retirement benefits for a peace officer employed by the state, other than by the
bureau of criminal investigation, reaching the normal retirement date equals an annual
amount, payable monthly, comprised of a service benefit and a prior service benefit
determined as follows:

S. B. NO. 2121 - PAGE 5
(1) For membersa member first enrolled:
(a) Before January 1, 2020, service benefit equals two percent of final average
salary multiplied by the number of years of service employment.
(b) After December 31, 2019, service benefit equals one and seventy-five
hundredths percent of final average salary multiplied by the number of years
of service employment.
(2) Prior service benefit equals two percent of final average salary multiplied by the
number of years of prior service employment.
e. Postponed retirement benefits are calculated as for single life benefits for those members
who retired on or after July 1, 1977.
f. Early retirement benefits are calculated as for single life benefits accrued to the date of
termination of employment, but must be actuarially reduced to account for benefit
payments beginning before the normal retirement date, as determined under
subsection 3. Except for a national guard security officer or firefighter, a firefighter, peace
officer, or correctional officer employed by a political subdivision, a peace officer
employed by the state, or a supreme court or district court judge, early retirement
benefits for members first enrolled after December 31, 2015, are calculated for single life
benefits accrued to the date of termination of employment, but must be reduced by fixed
rate of eight percent per year to account for benefit payments beginning before the
normal retirement date. A retiree, other than a supreme or district court judge, or a peace
officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation and hired after July 31, 2023 , is
eligible for early retirement benefits only after having completed three years of eligible
employment. A supreme or district court judge retiree is eligible for early retirement
benefits only after having completed five years of eligible employment. A peace officer
employed by the bureau of criminal investigation and hired after July 31, 2023, is eligible
for early retirement benefits only after having completed ten years of eligible
employment.
g. Except for a supreme andor district court judgesjudge, disability retirement benefits are
twenty-five percent of the member's final average salary. Disability retirement benefits for
a supreme andor district court judgesjudge are seventy percent of final average salary
reduced by the member's primaryany social security benefits and by any workforce
safety and insurance benefits paid to the member. The minimum monthly disability
retirement benefit under this section is one hundred dollars.
5. Upon termination of employment after completing three years of eligible employment, except
for a supreme andor district court judgesjudge, who must complete five years of eligible
employment, or a peace officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation and hired
after July 31, 2023, who must complete ten years of eligible employmen t, but before normal
retirement date, a member who does not elect to receive early retirement benefits is eligible to
receive deferred vested retirement benefits payable commencing on the member's normal
retirement date in one of the optional forms provided in subsection 9. Members who have
delayed or inadvertently failed to apply for retirement benefits to commence on their normal
retirement date may choose to receive either a lump sum payment equal to the amount of
missed payments, or an actuarial increase to the form of benefit the member has selected,
which increase must reflect the missed payments.
6. If before retiring a member dies after completing three years of eligible employment, except for
a supreme andor district court judgesjudge, who must have completed five years of eligible
employment, or a peace officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation and hired
after July 31, 2023, who must complete ten years of eligible employment , the board shall pay
the member's account balance to the member's designated beneficiary as provided in this

S. B. NO. 2121 - PAGE 6
subsection. If the member has designated an alternate beneficiary with the surviving spouse's
written consent, the board shall pay the member's account balance to the named beneficiary.
If the member has named more than one primary beneficiary, the board shall pay the
member's account balance to the named primary beneficiaries in the percentages designated
by the member or, if the member has not designated a percentage for the beneficiaries, in
equal percentages. If one or more of the primary beneficiaries has predeceased the member,
the board shall pay the predeceased beneficiary's share to the remaining primary
beneficiaries. If any beneficiary survives the member, yet dies before distribution of the
beneficiary's share, the beneficiary must be treated as if the beneficiary predeceased the
member. If there are no remaining primary beneficiaries, the board shall pay the member's
account balance to the contingent beneficiaries in the same manner. If there are no remaining
designated beneficiaries, the board shall pay the member's account balance to the member's
estate. If the member has not designated an alternate beneficiary or the surviving spouse is
the beneficiary, the surviving spouse of the member may select a form of payment as follows:
a. If the member was a supreme or district court judge, the surviving spouse may select one
of the following optional forms of payment:
(1) A lump sum payment of the member's retirement account as of the date of death.
(2) Payments as calculated for the deceased member as if the member was of normal
retirement age at the date of death, payable until the spouse dies.
b. The surviving spouse of all other members may select one of the following options:
(1) A lump sum payment of the member's retirement account as of the date of death.
(2) Payment of a monthly retirement benefit equal to fifty percent of the deceased
member's accrued single life retirement benefits until the spouse dies.
(3) If the member dies on or after the member's normal retirement date, the payment of
a monthly retirement benefit equal to an amount that would have been paid to the
surviving spouse if the member had retired on the day of the member's death and
had selected a one hundred percent joint and survivor annuity, payable until the
spouse dies. A surviving spouse who received a benefit under this subsection as of
July 31, 1995, is entitled to the higher of that person's existing benefit or the
equivalent of the accrued benefit available under the one hundred percent joint and
survivor provision as if the deceased member were of normal retirement age, with
the increase payable beginning August 1, 1995.
7. If a member not coming under the provisions of subsection 6 terminates employment because
of death, permanent and total disability, or any voluntary or involuntary reason prior to
retirement, the member or the member's designated beneficiary is entitled to the member's
account balance at termination. The board automatically shall refund a member's account
balance if the member has completed less than three years of eligible employment, has an
account balance of less than one thousand dollars, and was not a supreme or district court
judge or a peace officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation and hired after
July 31, 2023 . If the member was a supreme or district court judge, the board automatically
shall refund a member's account balance if the member completed less than five years of
eligible employment and has an account balance of less than one thousand dollars. If the
member was a peace officer employed by the bureau of criminal investigation and hired after
July 31, 2023, the board automatically shall refund a member's account balance if the member
completed less than ten years of eligible employment and has an account balance of less than
one thousand dollars. A member may waive the refund if the member submits a written
statement to the board, within thirty days after termination, requesting that the member's
account balance remain in the fund.

S. B. NO. 2121 - PAGE 7
8. The surviving spouse of a member receiving retirement benefits must be the member's
primary beneficiary unless there is no surviving spouse or the surviving spouse designates an
alternate beneficiary in writing. If a member receiving retirement benefits or the member's
surviving spouse receiving retirement benefits dies before the total amount of benefits paid to
either or both equals the amount of the member's account balance at retirement, the
difference must be paid to the named beneficiary of the recipient or, if there is no named
beneficiary, to the recipient's estate. A benefit payment owed to the member, surviving spouse,
or alternate beneficiary which was not paid before the death of the member, surviving spouse,
or alternate beneficiary must be paid to the named beneficiary of the recipient or, if there is no
named beneficiary, to the recipient's estate.
9. a. The board shall adopt rules providing for the receipt of retirement benefits in the following
optional forms:
a. (1) Single life.
b. (2) An actuarially equivalent joint and survivor option, with fifty percent or one hundred
percent options.
c. (3) Actuarially equivalent life with ten-year or twenty-year certain options.
d. (4) An actuarially equivalent partial lump sum distribution option with a twelve-month
maximum lump sum distribution.
e. (5) An actuarially equivalent graduated benefit option with either a one percent or two
percent increase to be applied the first day of January of each year.
b. Except for a supreme andor district court judgesjudge, unless a member specifically
requests that the member receive benefits according to one of these options at the time
of applying for retirement, all retirement benefits must be in the form of a single life
benefit. For a supreme andor district court judgesjudge, unless a member specifically
requests that the member receive benefits according to one of these options at the time
of applying for retirement, all retirement benefits must be in the form of a lifetime monthly
pension with fifty percent of the benefit continuing for the life of the surviving spouse, if
any.
10. The fund may accept rollovers from other eligible plans under rules adopted by the board for
the purchase of additional service credit, but only to the extent the transfer is a rollover
contribution that meets the requirement of section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code.
11. The board may accept trustee-to-trustee transfers as permitted by Internal Revenue Code
section 403(b)(13) and section 457(e)(17) from an Internal Revenue Code section 403(b)
annuity or Internal Revenue Code section 457 deferred compensation plan for the purchase of
permissive service credit, as defined in Internal Revenue Code section 415(n)(3)(A) or as
repayment of a cashout from a governmental plan under Internal Revenue Code section
415(k)(3).
12. The board may establish individual retirement accounts and individual retirement annuities as
permitted under section 408(q) of the Internal Revenue Code to allow employees to make
voluntary employee contributions. The board may adopt rules to implement and administer the
accounts and annuities under this section.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 54-52-28 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
2. The minimum distribution rules under section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code,
including the incidental death benefit requirements under section 401(a)(9)(G), and the
regulations issued under that provision to the extent applicable to governmental plans, as

S. B. NO. 2121 - PAGE 8
amended. Accordingly, benefits must be distributed or begin to be distributed no later than a
member's required beginning date, and the required minimum distribution rules override any
inconsistent provision of this chapter. For a member who attains age seventy and one-half
before January 1, 2020, the member's required beginning date is April first of the calendar
year following the later of the calendar year in which the member attains age seventy and
one-half or terminates employment. For a member who attains age seventy and one-half after
December 31, 2019, the member's required beginning date is April first of the calendar year
following the later of the calendar year in which the member attains age seventy-two or
terminates employment.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 54-52.1-03.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
54-52.1-03.1. Certain political subdivisions authorized to join uniform group insurance
program - Employer contribution.
If eligible under federal law, a political subdivision may extend the benefits of the uniform group
insurance program under this chapter to its permanent employees, subject to minimum requirements
established by the board and a minimum period of participation of sixty months. If the political
subdivision withdraws from participation in the uniform group insurance program, before completing
sixty months of participation, unless federal or state laws or rules are modified or interpreted in a way
that makes participation by the political subdivision in the uniform group insurance program no longer
allowable or appropriate, the political subdivision shall make payment to the board in an amount equal
to any expenses incurred in the uniform group insurance program that exceed income received on
behalf of the political subdivision's employees as determined under rules adopted by the board. The
Garrison Diversion Conservancy District, and district shall participate in the uniform group insurance
program under the same terms and conditions as state agencies. District health units required to
participate in the public employees retirement system under section 54-52-02, which were participating
in the uniform group insurance program at the time the Affordable Care Act was enacted, shall
participate in the uniform group insurance program under the same terms and conditions as state
agencies. A retiree who has accepted a retirement allowance from a participating political subdivision's
retirement plan may elect to participate in the uniform group under this chapter without meeting
minimum requirements at age sixty-five, when the employee's spouse reaches age sixty-five, upon the
receipt of a benefit, when the political subdivision joins the uniform group insurance plan if the retiree
was a member of the former plan, or when the spouse terminates employment. If a retiree or surviving
spouse does not elect to participate at the times specified in this section, the retiree or surviving spouse
must meet the minimum requirements established by the board. Each retiree or surviving spouse shall
pay directly to the board the premiums in effect for the coverage then being provided. The board may
require documentation that the retiree has accepted a retirement allowance from an eligible retirement
plan other than the public employees retirement system.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 54-52.2-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-52.2-06. Deferred compensation program - Benefits - Taxation - Exemption from judicial
process - Assignment.
The deferred compensation program established by this chapter shall exist and serve in addition to
retirement, pension, or benefit systems established by the state, county, city, town, or other political
subdivision, and no deferral of income under the deferred compensation program shall effect a
reduction of any retirement, pension, or other benefit provided by law. However, with the exception of
Roth contributions, any sum deferred under the deferred compensation program is not subject to
taxation until distribution is actually made to the employee. Any unpaid benefits under the deferred
compensation program established by this chapter are not subject to execution, garnishment,
attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or insolvency laws, or other process of law whatsoever, except
as provided by section 54-52.2-03.3. Neither the employee, the employee's beneficiary, nor any

S. B. NO. 2121 - PAGE 9
designee of the employee or the employee's beneficiary has the right to commute, sell, assign, transfer,
or otherwise convey the right to receive payments under this chapter.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Subsection 8 of section 54-52.6-01 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
8. "Wages" and "salaries" means earnings in eligible employment under this chapter reported as
salary on a federal income tax withholding statement plus any salary reduction or salary
deferral amounts under 26 U.S.C. 125, 401(k), 403(b), 414(h), or 457. "Salary" does not
include fringe benefits such as payments for unused sick leave, personal leave, vacation leave
paid in a lump sum, overtime, housing allowances, transportation expenses, early retirement,
incentive pay, severance pay, medical insurance, workforce safety and insurance benefits,
disability insurance premiums or benefits, or salary received by a member in lieu of previously
employer-provided fringe benefits under an agreement between an employee and a
participating employer. Bonuses may be considered as salary under this section if reported
and annualized pursuant to rules adopted by the board.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 54-52.6-02.2 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. As used in this section, "eligible employee" means a permanent state employee who on
December 31, 2024, is a participating member of the public employees retirement system
main system plan under chapter 54-42 54 - 52 , who has been a participating member under
chapter 54-52 for no more than five years, and who is at least eighteen years of age.

S. B. NO. 2121 - PAGE 10
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2121.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State